Massachusetts, session 194th, H2373.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 118I of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 17. (a) Upon request, a provider shall supply to a patient or a patient's authorized
representative within 15 business days of receiving a written request for medical records
complete and current information possessed by that provider concerning any diagnosis,
treatment, and prognosis of the patient in terms and language the patient can reasonably be
expected to understand.
(b) Except as provided in section (a), upon a patient's written request, a provider, at a
reasonable cost to the patient, shall promptly furnish to the patient or the patient's authorized
representative within 15 business days of receiving a written request for medical records:
of 2

(1) copies of the patient's health record, including but not limited to laboratory reports, x-
rays, prescriptions, and other technical information used in assessing the patient's health
conditions; or
(2) the pertinent portion of the record relating to a condition specified by the patient.
With the consent of the patient, the provider may instead furnish only a summary of the record.
The provider may exclude from the health record written speculations about the patient's health
condition, except that all information necessary for the patient's informed consent must be
provided.
of 2